Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-15,134
Discrimination prohibited.

Nothing contained in the Nebraska Housing Agency Act shall limit the ability of any local housing agency to establish and apply different criteria or requirements with respect to admissions and occupancy, to utilize different methods of establishing and charging rents, or to impose different occupancy standards (1) for different developments or portions thereof or (2) with respect to recipients of assistance in any program designed or intended to differentiate between individual recipients on the basis of their circumstances, actions, or characteristics, except that a housing agency shall not discriminate on the basis of race, national origin, or religion.

Laws 1999, LB 105, § 63.